Maryland, session 2025, HB1454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Department of Aging shall contract with an independent consultant to
complete a study that shall include:
(1) an assessment of the capabilities of certain State agencies, including
the Maryland Insurance Administration, the Department of Aging, the Maryland
Department of Health, the Maryland Department of Labor, and the Office of the Attorney
General, to serve as the leading State agency that licenses and regulates continuing care
retirement communities and continuing care at–home providers;
(2) a survey of the roles needed in the Maryland Insurance Administration,
the Department of Aging, the Maryland Department of Health, the Maryland Department
of Labor, and the Office of the Attorney General to effectively regulate continuing care
retirement communities compared with the departmental and personnel roles already in
place;
(3) a survey of how other states regulate continuing care retirement
communities and continuing care at–home providers, including fees and penalties assessed,
funding for state oversight, and comparative regulatory trends; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1454*

HOUSE BILL 1454
(4) a comparison of the statutes and regulations that authorize the
Department of Aging to license and regulate continuing care retirement communities and
continuing care at–home providers in the State, including Title 10, Subtitle 4 of the Human
Services Article and COMAR 32.02.01 and 32.02.02, to the laws of other states surveyed
under paragraph (3) of this subsection.
(b) The study conducted under subsection (a) of this section shall include input
from:
(1) the Maryland Insurance Administration;
(2) the Department of Aging;
(3) the Maryland Department of Health;
(4) the Maryland Department of Labor; and
(5) the Office of the Attorney General.
(c) On or before December 1, 2026, the Department of Aging shall submit the
results of the study required under subsection (a) of this section to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Section 1 of this Act is contingent on funding to conduct the study required
under Section 1 of this Act being appropriated to the Department of Aging through the
State budget.
(b) Within 5 days of receiving sufficient funding to conduct the study required
under Section 1 of this Act, the Department of Aging shall notify the Department of
Legislative Services.
(c) If notice of the receipt of the funding is received by the Department of
Legislative Services on or before July 1, 2026, Section 1 of this Act shall take effect on the
date the notice is received by the Department of Legislative Services in accordance with
subsection (b) of this section. Section 1 of this Act shall remain effective through June 30,
2027, and at the end of June 30, 2027, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
(d) If notice of the receipt of the funding is not received by the Department of
Legislative Services on or before July 1, 2026, Section 1 of this Act, with no further action
required by the General Assembly, shall be null and void.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 2 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2025.